Vermont statutes. Title 24 Municipal and County Government
Chapter 125. Municipal Employees’ Retirement System of Vermont
§ 5058.
Reinstatement.

Should a disability beneficiary be restored to service and should his or her annual earnable compensation then or at any time thereafter be equal to or greater than his or her average final compensation at retirement, or should any other beneficiary be restored to service, his or her retirement allowance shall cease and the beneficiary shall again become a member of the Retirement System.
Anything in this chapter to the contrary notwithstanding, upon his or her subsequent retirement he or she shall be credited with all the service creditable to him or her at the time of his or her former retirement.
However, if such beneficiary is restored to membership after the attainment of the age of 55 years, his or her pension upon subsequent retirement shall not exceed the sum of the pension that he or she was receiving immediately prior to his or her last restoration to membership and the pension that may have accrued to him or her on account of membership service since his or her last restoration to membership.

HISTORY:

Added

1973, No. 251

(Adj. Sess.), § 3.

§ 5059.
Termination of service; preretirement death benefit.

Upon the withdrawal of a member from service prior to retirement for reasons other than death, the amount of the member’s accumulated contributions with interest will be returnable to the member. In lieu of a return of contributions, any member who has completed five years of credited service, and at least two and one-half years of which have been as a contributing member, may allow his or her contributions to remain in the System and receive a deferred vested retirement allowance, commencing as early as the eligibility date for early retirement, which shall be equal to an early or a normal retirement allowance accrued to the member’s date of termination of continuous service. The average final compensation used to calculate the normal retirement allowance under this section shall be increased or decreased annually by a cost of living adjustment equal to one-half of the percentage increase or decrease, calculated to the nearest one-tenth of a percent in the Consumer Price Index, as defined in section 5067 of this title, for the preceding fiscal year. The increase or decrease shall commence on the January 1 immediately following separation from service. The maximum annual adjustment of any retirement allowance resulting from any cost of living adjustment under this subsection shall be two percent for Group A members and three percent for Group B, Group C, or Group D members.

Unless the designated dependent beneficiary elects to receive payment of a deceased member’s accumulated contributions as provided under subsection (a) of this section, the retirement allowance payable to the dependent beneficiary of a deceased Group A, Group B, or Group C member under this section shall be equal to the retirement allowance that would have been payable had the member elected option 1 under section 5060 of this title and retired on the member’s date of death; the retirement allowance payable to the spouse of a Group D member under this section shall be equal to 70 percent of the retirement allowance that would have been payable had the member retired on the member’s date of death. In the case of a member who has not attained the normal retirement date as of his or her date of death, the retirement allowance shall be computed on the basis of a disability retirement allowance or an early retirement allowance, whichever provides the greater benefit to the dependent beneficiary. If the deceased member has no eligible designated dependent beneficiary, the member’s accumulated contributions shall be payable to the member’s designated beneficiaries. In the absence of a designated beneficiary, or in the event the designated beneficiary is deceased, the return of accumulated contributions with interest payable as a result of the death of the member prior to retirement shall be payable as follows:

In the case of an open estate, to the administrator or executor.

In the case of a closed estate and the deceased member’s account is valued at less than $1,000.00, in accordance with the Probate Division of the Superior Court decree of distribution.

In the absence of an open estate or Probate Division of the Superior Court decree of distribution, and the deceased member’s account is valued at less than $1,000.00 to the surviving spouse of the deceased owner, or, if there is no surviving spouse, then to the next of kin according to

14 V.S.A. § 551

.

In all other cases, a probate estate shall be opened by the claimant, or other interested party, in order to determine the appropriate distribution of the proceeds of the deceased member’s account. When an estate is opened solely to distribute the proceeds of a deceased member’s account under this section, the Probate Division of the Superior Court may waive any filing fees.

HISTORY:

Added

1973, No. 251

(Adj. Sess.), § 3; amended

1987, No. 39

, § 6;

1989, No. 11

, § 5;

1999, No. 53

, § 10;

2001, No. 116

(Adj. Sess.), § 11, eff. May 28, 2002;

2005, No. 197

(Adj. Sess.), § 6;

2007, No. 13

, § 42;

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 238a, eff. Feb. 1, 2011;

2013, No. 22

, § 14.

§ 5060.
Optional benefits.

Until the first payment on account of a retirement allowance becomes normally due, any member may elect to convert the retirement allowance otherwise payable to the member after retirement into a retirement allowance that is its actuarial equivalent, in accordance with one of the optional forms described below.

Option 1.

A reduced retirement allowance payable during the member’s life, with the provision that it shall continue after the member’s death for the life of the beneficiary nominated by the member by written designation duly acknowledged and filed with the Retirement Board at the time of retirement should such beneficiary survive the member; or

Option 2.

A reduced retirement allowance payable during the member’s life, with the provision that it shall continue after the member’s death at one-half the rate paid to the member and be paid for the life of the beneficiary nominated by the member by written designation duly acknowledged and filed with the Retirement Board at the time of retirement should such beneficiary survive the member.

Any member who elects to receive a retirement allowance under the provisions of option 1 or 2 may elect to receive a benefit further reduced actuarially as prescribed by the Board with the added provision that on the basis of stipulations contained in a plan-approved domestic relations order or if the retired member survives the member’s nominated beneficiary, the retirement allowance which would have been payable during the member’s life computed pursuant to section 5055 or 5056 of this title, whichever is applicable, shall be paid to the retired member during the remainder of the member’s lifetime. If a member does not make an election as to the form of his or her retirement allowance, the member shall receive his or her retirement allowance computed pursuant to section 5055 or 5056 of this title, whichever is applicable.

HISTORY:

Added

1973, No. 251

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

1999, No. 53

, § 11.

§ 5061.
Death benefit; post retirement.

The beneficiary of a member who dies after retirement shall receive at the member’s death, a lump sum equal in amount to the difference between the member’s accumulated contributions at the time of retirement and the sum of the annuity payments actually made to the member during his or her lifetime. However, if the member elected an option prior to the commencement of the benefit, the provisions thereof shall apply. Under all options, in the absence of a written designation of beneficiary, or in the event the designated beneficiary is deceased, the residual amount payable as a result of the death of the member after retirement shall be payable as follows:

In the case of an open estate, to the administrator or executor.

In the case of a closed estate and the residual amount payable is valued at less than $1,000.00, in accordance with the Probate Division of the Superior Court decree of distribution.

In the absence of an open estate or Probate Division of the Superior Court decree of distribution, and the residual amount payable is valued at less than $1,000.00 to the surviving spouse of the deceased owner, or, if there is no surviving spouse, then to the next of kin according to

14 V.S.A. § 551

.

In all other cases, a probate estate shall be opened by the claimant, or other interested party, in order to determine the appropriate distribution of the residual amount payable. When an estate is opened solely to distribute the residual amount payable under this section, the Probate Division of the Superior Court may waive any filing fees.

HISTORY:

Added

1973, No. 251

(Adj. Sess.), § 3; amended

2007, No. 13

, § 43;

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 238a, eff. Feb. 1, 2011.

§ 5061a.
Accidental and occupationally-related death benefit.

If the Retirement Board shall find on the basis of such evidence as may come before it that a Group D member in service died prior to retirement under the System as the natural and proximate result of an accident occurring at a definite time and place during the course of the member’s performance of duty as an employee, and that such accident was not the result of the member’s own gross negligence or willful misconduct, a retirement allowance shall be paid the member’s dependent beneficiary during the beneficiary’s life. The terms and conditions of such payments shall be the same as those prescribed for Group C members as defined in

3 V.S.A. § 464

.

HISTORY:

Added

1999, No. 61

, § 8.

§ 5061b.
Death benefit after retirement—Group D.

If a Group D member in receipt of a retirement allowance dies, the member’s dependent spouse shall receive, until his or her death, a retirement allowance which shall be equal to 70 percent of the retirement allowance to which the member was then entitled, without optional modification, irrespective of whether the member had elected such an option.

HISTORY:

Added

1999, No. 61

, § 9.

§ 5062.
Retirement Board; Medical Board; actuary; rates of contribution; safekeeping of securities.

The general administration and responsibility for the proper operation of the Retirement System and for making effective the provisions of this chapter are hereby vested in a board of five trustees, known as the Retirement Board. The Board shall consist of:
(a) (1) The general administration and responsibility for the proper operation of the Retirement System and for making effective the provisions of this chapter are hereby vested in a board of five trustees, known as the Retirement Board. The Board shall consist of:

the State Treasurer;

two employee representatives who shall at all times during their term of office both be contributing members of the System and have completed five years of creditable service, elected by the membership of the System;

one employer representative who shall at all times during their term of office be a member of a governing body, the chief executive officer, or a supervisor as defined in

21 V.S.A. § 1502(13)

, of an employer participating in the System, elected by the governing bodies of the System employers; and

one employer representative who shall at all times during their term of office be a member of a governing body, the chief executive officer, or a supervisor as defined in

21 V.S.A. § 1502(13)

, of an employer participating in the System, appointed by the Governor from a list of not less than three nominations jointly submitted by the Vermont League of Cities and Towns and the Vermont School Boards Association.

An individual shall not be eligible to serve as an employee representative if the individual is eligible to serve as an employer representative.

All trustees shall be entitled to the necessary expenses, including traveling expenses, incurred in the discharge of their duties. All trustees shall be entitled to receive a per diem as provided in

32 V.S.A. § 1010

except a trustee who is a State or municipal employee, provided that a trustee who is a municipal employee shall be entitled to the per diem when the trustee’s compensation from the municipality is reduced as result of the performance of his or her official duties, or the trustee’s official duties are performed on his or her personal time. Compensation or reimbursements under this subsection shall be from the Fund of the Retirement System.

Each trustee shall be entitled to one vote in the Retirement Board. Three trustees shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of any business. A majority vote of those present and voting shall be necessary for any resolution or action by the Retirement Board at any meeting of the Board. All trustees shall be notified of any meeting of the Board. The State Treasurer may designate in writing a person within the State Treasurer’s Office to attend a meeting or meetings of the Retirement Board in the State Treasurer’s place. The designation shall be filed with the Secretary of the Board. A person so designated shall have the same voting rights and responsibilities as the State Treasurer at such meeting or meetings except that the designee shall not automatically assume the Treasurer’s place as an officer of the Board.

Subject to the limitations of this chapter, the Retirement Board shall, from time to time, establish rules and regulations for the administration of the Fund of the Retirement System and for the transaction of its business.

The Retirement Board shall elect from its membership a chair and shall appoint a secretary who may be, but need not be, one of the trustees. It shall engage such medical, actuarial, and other services as shall be required to transact the business of the Retirement System. The compensation of all persons engaged by the Retirement Board, and all other expenses of the Board necessary for the operation of the Retirement System, shall be paid at such rates and in such amounts as the Board shall approve.

The Retirement Board shall keep in convenient form such data as shall be necessary for actuarial valuation of the Fund of the Retirement System, and for checking the experience of the System.

The Retirement Board shall keep a record of all its proceedings, which shall be open to public inspection. It shall publish annually a report showing the fiscal transactions of the Retirement System for the preceding fiscal year, the amount of the accumulated cash and securities of the System, and the last balance sheet showing the financial condition of the Retirement System by means of an actuarial valuation of the assets and liabilities of the System.

The Attorney General of the State shall be legal advisor to the Retirement Board.

The Retirement Board shall designate a Medical Board to be composed of three physicians not eligible to participate in the Retirement System. If required, other physicians may be employed to report on special cases. The Medical Board shall arrange for and pass upon all medical examinations required under the provisions of this chapter, shall investigate all essential statements and certificates by or on behalf of a member in connection with an application for disability retirement, and shall report in writing to the Retirement Board of its conclusions and recommendations upon all matters referred to it.

The Retirement Board shall designate an actuary who shall be the technical advisor of the Board on matters regarding the operation of the Fund of the Retirement System and shall perform such other duties as are required in connection therewith.

Immediately after the establishment of the Retirement System, the Retirement Board shall adopt for the Retirement System such mortality and service tables as shall be deemed necessary and shall certify the rates of contribution payable under the provisions of this chapter. Beginning July 1, 2023, at least once every three fiscal years following the establishment of the System, the actuary shall make an actuarial investigation into the mortality, service, and compensation experience of the members and beneficiaries of the Retirement System, and taking into account the results of such investigation, the Retirement Board shall adopt for the Retirement System such mortality, service, and other tables as shall be deemed necessary and shall certify the rates of contribution payable under the provisions of this chapter.

On the basis of such mortality and service tables as the Retirement Board shall adopt, the actuary shall make annual valuations of the assets and liabilities of the Fund of the Retirement System.

The Vermont Pension Investment Commission shall designate from time to time a depository for the securities and evidences of indebtedness held in the Fund of the System and may contract for the safekeeping of securities and evidences of indebtedness within and without the State of Vermont in such banks, trust companies, and safe-deposit facilities as it shall from time to time determine. The necessary and incidental expenses of such safekeeping and for service rendered, including advisory services in investment matters, shall be paid from the operation expenses of the System as hereinafter provided. Any agreement for the safekeeping of securities or evidences of indebtedness shall provide for the access to such securities and evidences of indebtedness, except securities loaned pursuant to a securities lending agreement as authorized by subsection (o) of this section, at any time by the custodian or any authorized agent of the State for audit or other purposes.

The Board shall determine the election procedures by which the two employee representatives and employer representative elected by the governing bodies of the System employers who are members of the Board are elected. Elections shall be held to take effect on July 1, 2010, for the first employee representative and employer representative elected by the governing bodies of the System employers and every four years thereafter; and on July 1, 2012, for the second employee representative and employer representative appointed by the Governor and every four years thereafter. The term in office for each elected member of the Board shall be four years. Vacancies of an elected Board member’s seat in midterm shall be filled by an individual eligible for election to that seat designated by the remaining members of the Board.

The Vermont Pension Investment Commission may authorize the loan of its securities pursuant to securities lending agreements that provide for collateral consisting of cash or securities issued or guaranteed by the U.S. government or its agencies equal to 100 percent or more of the market value of the loaned securities. Cash collateral may be invested by the lending institution in investments approved by the State Treasurer. Approval of investments shall be made in accordance with the standard of care established by the prudent investor rule under 9 V.S.A. chapter 147.

HISTORY:

Added

1973, No. 251

(Adj. Sess.), § 3; amended

1977, No. 205

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

1985, No. 223

(Adj. Sess.);

1987, No. 92

, § 5, eff. June 23, 1987;

1991, No. 151

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 5, 6;

1995, No. 36

, § 9;

1999, No. 158

(Adj. Sess.), § 25;

2005, No. 50

, § 8;

2007, No. 13

, § 44;

2009, No. 139

(Adj. Sess.), § 8, eff. June 30, 2010;

2013, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 72;

2021, No. 75

, § 8, eff. June 8, 2021;

2021, No. 114

(Adj. Sess.), § 27, effective July 1, 2022.

§ 5063.
Investments; interest rate; disbursements.

The members of the Vermont Pension Investment Commission established in 3 V.S.A. chapter 17 shall be the trustees of the Fund created by this chapter, and with respect to them may invest and reinvest the assets of the Fund, and hold, purchase, sell, assign, transfer, and dispose of the securities and investments in which the assets of the Fund have been invested and reinvested. Investments shall be made with judgment and care, under circumstances then prevailing, which persons of prudence, discretion, and intelligence exercise in the management of their own affairs, not for speculation, but for investment, considering the probable safety of capital as well as the probable income to be derived.

From time to time, the Retirement Board shall set the rate or rates of regular interest at such percent rate compounded annually as shall be determined by the Board, such rate to be limited to a minimum of three percent and a maximum of five percent.

The State Treasurer shall be the custodian of the assets of the Fund of the Retirement System. All payments from the Fund shall be made by the Treasurer or by the Deputy Treasurer, with approval of the Retirement Board. A duly attested copy of a resolution of the Retirement Board designating such persons and bearing on its face specimen signatures of such persons shall be filed with the State Treasurer as his or her authority for making payments upon such vouchers.

[Repealed.]

Except as otherwise herein provided, no trustee and no employee of the Retirement Board or Vermont Pension Investment Commission shall have any direct interest in the gains or profits of any investment made by the Commission, nor shall any trustee, member of the Commission, or employee of the Board or Commission, directly or indirectly, for himself or herself or as an agent, in any manner use the same except to make such current and necessary payments as are authorized by the Board or Commission; nor shall any trustee or employee of the Board or Commission become an endorser or surety, or in any manner an obligor, for monies loaned to or borrowed from the Board.

HISTORY:

Added

1973, No. 251

(Adj. Sess.), § 3; amended

1981, No. 41

, § 37;

1985, No. 171

(Adj. Sess.), § 5, eff. May 7, 1986;

1987, No. 80

, § 10, eff. June 9, 1987;

1995, No. 118

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

2005, No. 50

, § 9;

2007, No. 13

, § 45;

2021, No. 75

, § 9, eff. June 8, 2021.

§ 5063a.
Compliance with federal law.

Intent. The General Assembly intends that the Retirement System and any trusts or custodial accounts established to hold the assets of the Retirement System in accordance with subsection (b) of this section be maintained, in form and operation, so as to maintain the status of the Retirement System as a qualified plan under

26 U.S.C. § 401(a)

as amended, and the tax exempt status of such trusts and custodial accounts under

26 U.S.C. § 501(a)

, to the extent that those requirements apply to a governmental plan as described in 26 U.S.C. § 414. Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter to the contrary, this section shall be applicable, administered, and interpreted in a manner consistent with maintaining the tax qualification of the Retirement System as a qualified plan and the tax exempt status of such trusts and custodial accounts under 26 U.S.C. §§ 401(a) and 501(a), respectively.

Exclusive benefit. All assets of the Retirement System shall be held in trust, in one or more custodial accounts treated as trusts in accordance with

26 U.S.C. § 401(f)

, or in a combination thereof. Under any trust or custodial account, it shall be impossible at any time prior to the satisfaction of all liabilities with respect to members and their beneficiaries for any part of the corpus or income to be used for or diverted to purposes other than the exclusive benefit of members and their beneficiaries. However, this requirement shall not prohibit:

the return of a contribution within six months after the Retirement System determines that the contribution was made by a mistake of fact; or

payment of the expenses of the Retirement System.

Vesting on plan termination. In the event of the termination of the Retirement System, the accrued benefits of eligible members shall become fully and immediately vested.

Forfeitures. Service credits forfeited by a member for any reason shall not be applied to increase the benefits of any other member.

Required distributions. Distributions shall begin to be made not later than the member’s required beginning date as defined under

26 U.S.C. § 401(a)

(9) and shall be made in accordance with all other requirements of that subsection. Benefits shall be paid under the maximum allowance pursuant to this subsection even though the member has not previously applied to receive them. The System shall be deemed to be in compliance with the terms of

26 U.S.C. § 401(a)

(9) so long as it is administered under a reasonable good faith interpretation of that subsection.

Limitation on benefits. Benefits shall not be payable to the extent that they exceed the limitations imposed by 26 U.S.C. § 415, as adjusted for increases in the cost of living.

Limitation on compensation. Benefits and contributions shall not be computed with reference to any compensation that exceeds the maximum dollar amount permitted by

26 U.S.C. § 401(a)

(17) as adjusted for increases in the cost of living.

Actuarial determination. Whenever the amount of any member’s benefit is to be determined on the basis of actuarial assumptions done by a professional actuary, those assumptions shall be specified by resolution, which documentation shall be incorporated in the System by reference. The Board shall also adopt interest and mortality assumptions for the purposes of determining actuarial equivalent benefits under the System. The Board shall adopt assumptions by resolution, which documentation shall be incorporated in the System by reference.

Direct rollovers. An individual withdrawing a distribution from the Retirement System which constitutes an “eligible rollover distribution” within the meaning of 26 U.S.C. § 402, may elect, in the time and manner prescribed by the Retirement Board and after receipt of proper notice, to have any portion of the distribution paid directly to another plan that is qualified under

26 U.S.C. § 401(a)

, to an annuity plan described in

26 U.S.C. § 403(a)

, to an annuity contract described in

26 U.S.C. § 403(b)

, or to an eligible plan described in

26 U.S.C. § 457(b)

that is maintained by a state, political subdivision of a state, or any agency or instrumentality of a state or political subdivision of a state and that agrees to account separately for amounts transferred into such plan, or to an individual retirement account or annuity described in

26 U.S.C. § 408(a)

or (b), in a direct rollover. For distributions made after December 31, 2009 in accordance with

26 U.S.C. § 402(c)

(11), a nonspouse beneficiary who is a designated beneficiary under

26 U.S.C. § 401(a)

(9), may establish an individual retirement account into which all or a portion of a death distribution from the Retirement System to which such nonspouse beneficiary is entitled can be transferred directly.

Compliance with the Uniformed Services Employment and Reemployment Rights Act (USERRA). Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, contributions, benefits, and service credits with respect to qualified military service shall be provided under the System in accordance with

26 U.S.C. § 414(u)

, unless State law provides more favorable benefits than those required by federal law. The survivors of a member who dies after December 31, 2006 while performing qualified military service shall be entitled to any additional benefits, other than benefit accruals related to the period of qualified military service, that would have been provided under the Plan had the member resumed employment and then terminated employment on account of death.

Consent. An individual who is not a vested member of the System and who has not yet reached the later of normal retirement age or age 62 must consent to any withdrawal of his or her assets of greater than $1,000.00. For individuals who are not vested members of the System and who have reached the later of normal retirement age or age 62, amounts greater than $1,000.00 may be paid out without the individual’s consent. In all cases, amounts of $1,000.00 or less may be paid out without the individual’s consent.

Rules. The Board may adopt rules to ensure that this chapter complies with federal law requirements.

HISTORY:

Added

2007, No. 13

, § 46; amended

2009, No. 24

, § 12;

2015, No. 18

, § 9;

2017, No. 165

(Adj. Sess.), § 26;

2019, No. 14

, § 68, eff. April 30, 2019.

§ 5064.
Funds.

Fund. All of the assets of the Retirement System shall be credited to the Vermont Municipal Retirement Fund.

Member savings. Contributions deducted from the compensation of members together with any member contributions transferred from a predecessor system shall be accumulated in the Fund and separately recorded for each member. Contributions shall be made by Group A members at the rate of three percent of earnable compensation. Contributions shall be made by Group B members at the rate of five percent of earnable compensation. Contributions shall be made by Group C and Group D members at a rate of 11 percent of earnable compensation. Additionally, if an employee remains in Group C and is employed by an employer who elects to revoke its Group C membership in accordance with subsection 5068(f) of this title, the rate established in this subsection will be adjusted. This adjustment shall be determined by subtracting the Group B rate, or if not applicable, the Group A rate determined in subdivision (c)(1) of this section from the Group C rate determined in subdivision (c)(1) of this section.

The deductions provided for in this section shall be made notwithstanding that the minimum compensation provided for by law for any member shall be reduced thereby. Every member shall be deemed to consent and agree to the deductions made and provided pursuant to this section and shall receipt for the member’s full compensation, and payment of compensation less such deduction shall be a full and complete discharge and acquittance of all claims and demands whatsoever for the services rendered by such person during the period covered by such payment, except as to the benefits provided under this chapter.

The contributions of a member and interest as may be allowed thereon which are withdrawn by the member or paid to the member’s estate or to the designated beneficiary in event of the member’s death, shall be paid from the Fund.

The employer shall make one of the following elections:

To make, on behalf of the members, all or any part of contributions required to be made by members under this section. Each of the amounts shall be deducted until the member retires or otherwise withdraws from service, and when deducted shall be paid into the Fund and credited to the individual account of the member from whose compensation the deduction was made.

Pursuant to the provisions of Section 414(h) of the Internal Revenue Code, to pick up and pay the contributions required to be paid by members with respect to service rendered on and after July 1, 1999. Contributions picked up by the municipality under this election shall be designated for all purposes as member contributions, except that they shall be treated as employer contributions in determining tax treatment of a distribution. Each member’s compensation shall be reduced by an amount equal to the amount picked up by the municipality. This reduction, however, shall not be used to determine annual earnable compensation for purposes of determining average final compensation. Contributions picked up under this subdivision shall be credited to the Fund.

Employer contributions, earnings, and payments. All employer contributions and all reserves for the payment of all pensions and other benefits, including all interest and dividends earned on the assets of the Retirement System shall be accumulated in the Fund, and all benefits payable under the System and expenses of the System shall be paid from the Fund.

On account of each member, an employer shall report earnable compensation and pay annually, in installments as determined by the Board, into the Fund an amount equal to the certain percentage of the annual earnable compensation of such member. Such contribution percentage shall be separately determined for each group of membership within the Retirement System as the sum of “normal contribution rate” for such membership group and its “accrued liability contribution rate,” such sum to be reduced by the member contribution rate provided for in subsection (b) of this section.

On the basis of the actuarial assumptions and methodology as shall be adopted by the Retirement Board, immediately after making each actuarial valuation, the actuary shall determine the “normal contribution rate” for each group of membership. The product of a membership group’s normal contribution rate and its total earnable compensation shall be referred to as that membership group’s “normal contribution.”

In each actuarial valuation, the actuary shall, based on methodology adopted by the Retirement Board, determine the amount of the Fund attributable to each membership group within the Retirement System for valuation purposes. The difference between each membership group’s accrued liability and its allocated share of Fund assets as of any valuation date shall be referred to as such membership group’s “unfunded accrued liability.”

For each actuarial valuation completed on or after July 1, 2009, the accrued liability contribution rate shall be computed for each membership group based on the actuarial assumptions and methodology adopted by the Retirement Board as the rate percent of the earnable compensation of the employees in such membership group which, if applied to expected future earnings of current and future employees of such membership group, would be expected to liquidate the membership group’s unfunded accrued liability on or before June 30, 2038. The product of a membership group’s accrued liability rate and its total earnable compensation shall be referred to as that membership group’s “accrued liability contribution.”

The accrued liability contribution for a separate membership group shall be discontinued, and the unfunded accrued liability for such membership group shall be set equal to zero in the event the assets attributable to such membership group should exceed the accrued liability as determined under the assumptions and methodology approved by the Retirement Board.

The Retirement Board shall have performed a separate actuarial valuation for each group entering the System under the provisions of subsection 5054(e) of this title to determine the amount of liability, the deposit required to pay for that liability, and the amount of increased rate of contribution required to pay for the liability not covered by any lump sum deposit, such rate to be calculated by the actuary as the excess, if any, of the accrued liability contribution rate of subdivision (c)(3) of this section determined separately for the group entering the System over such rate for the System, calculated excluding such group. Such additional rate shall be paid by the entering group over a specified period as determined by the Board, not to exceed 30 years. The rate determined as a result of the actuarial calculation under this subdivision shall be paid by each employer entering the System under subsection 5054(e) in addition to the amount paid in accordance with subdivision (4) of this subsection.

Operation expenses. As provided by law, the Board shall certify to the Governor or Governor-Elect an estimated amount required for operation expenses of the System in the next annual or biennial period. The amount so certified shall be included in the budget, with the revenue derived from the Vermont Municipal Retirement Fund, and submitted to the General Assembly.

Remittance of member contributions and employer contributions. Each employer shall remit its employer contributions and the member contributions applicable to its employees in installments as determined by the Board to the State Treasurer.

Any payments due which are not received within 30 days after the installment due date set by the Board shall result in a penalty assessment against the employer at the rate of one percent of the amount due for each month calculated from the installment due date, provided that the Board may, in its discretion, waive part or all of said penalty assessment if good cause is shown. The delinquent payments and penalties thereon may be recovered by action in a court of competent jurisdiction against the employer liable therefor or may be deducted by, or at the request of, the State Treasurer from any other monies payable to such employer by the State or any department or agency thereof.

All employers shall provide accurate reports. Employers providing inaccurate reports shall be responsible for correcting any deficiencies and shall reimburse the System for any costs incurred by the System as a result of inaccuracy.

In the event that an employer willfully files an inaccurate report, in addition to any other penalties provided by law, the employer shall pay the System an administrative penalty of up to 50 percent of the amount that was not accurately reported.

The System may enforce the provisions of this section in Washington Superior Court.

The Board may, in its discretion, waive part or all of a penalty assessment for good cause shown.

[Repealed.]

HISTORY:

Added

1973, No. 251

(Adj. Sess.), § 3; amended

1975, No. 254

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 149-151;

1977, No. 205

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

1983, No. 128

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

1985, No. 74

, § 302;

1987, No. 39

, §§ 7, 8, 11;

1989, No. 11

, § 8a;

1991, No. 233

(Adj. Sess.), § 6;

1995, No. 25

, §§ 2, 3;

1999, No. 53

, § 13;

1999, No. 61

, § 4;

1999, No. 158

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 14, 16;

2001, No. 29

, § 11;

2005, No. 44

, § 1;

2005, No. 197

(Adj. Sess.), § 7;

2007, No. 13

, § 47;

2009, No. 24

, § 12a;

2009, No. 139

(Adj. Sess.), § 9.

§ 5065.
Errors.

Should any change or error in the records result in any member or beneficiary receiving from the Retirement System more or less than he or she would have been entitled to receive had the records been correct, the Retirement Board shall have the power to correct such error, and to adjust as far as practicable the payments in such a manner that the actuarial equivalent of the benefit to which such member or beneficiary was correctly entitled shall be paid or in such a manner that the impact upon the Fund is de minimis.

HISTORY:

Added

1973, No. 251

(Adj. Sess.), § 3; amended

2017, No. 165

(Adj. Sess.), § 27.

§ 5066.
Exemption of member’s interest; assignment.

That portion of the salary or wages of a member deducted or to be deducted under this chapter, the right of a member to an annuity, pension, or retirement allowance hereunder, and all the member’s rights in the assets of the Retirement System, shall be exempt from taxation, except income tax, and from the operation of any laws relating to bankruptcy or insolvency, and shall not be attached or taken upon execution or other process of any court. No assignment by a member of any part of the assets to which the member is or may be entitled, or of any right to or interest in those assets, shall be valid, except to the extent permitted by this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

1973, No. 251

(Adj. Sess.), § 3; amended

2007, No. 13

, § 48.